sms/src/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
!! !!!Skolt Saami adjective declension


LEXICON A_
+A+WORK: # ;

LEXICON A-ATTR_
+A+Attr: # ;
+A+Der/vuõtt:»vuõtt N_MUORR ; 

LEXICON A-ATTR_âs
+A+Attr:%>âs # ;
+A+Comp+Attr:»ab # ;
+A+Superl+Attr:»mõs # ;
+A+Comp:»ab NMN_AANAR ;
+A+Superl:»mõs NMN_SAJOS ;
+A+Der/vuõtt:%>âs»vuõtt N_MUORR ; 

LEXICON A-ATTR_as
+A+Attr:%>as # ;
+A+Comp+Attr:»ab # ;
+A+Superl+Attr:»mõs # ;
+A+Comp:»ab NMN_AANAR ;
+A+Superl:»mõs NMN_SAJOS ;
+A+Der/vuõtt:%>as»vuõtt N_MUORR ; 

LEXICON A-ATTR_es
+A+Attr:%>es # ;
+A+Superl+Attr:»mõs # ;
+A: ADJ-DER/COMP_ab ; !!= * @CODE@ This has a Comp+Attr
!+A+Comp:»ab NMN_AANAR ;
+A+Superl:»mõs NMN_SAJOS ;
+A+Der/vuõtt:%>es»vuõtt N_MUORR ; 


!! CLASS 1 HIGH VOWEL, NO PALATALIZATION NOMINALS
LEXICON A_PAPP !!= * @CODE@ papp:papp
!! 
:%^V2VV A-ATTR_âs ;
+A+Sg+Nom: FINAL1 ;
+A+Pl+Nom:%^V2VV FINAL1 ; 
!+A+Der/MWN:  N_PAPP ;
+A:  NMN_PAPP ;

LEXICON A_TOLL
:%^V2VV%^CC2C A-ATTR_âs ;
+A+Sg+Nom: FINAL1 ;
+A+Pl+Nom:%^V2VV%^CC2C FINAL1 ; !!= * @CODE@ Check this 2015-02-22
!+A+Der/MWN: N_TOLL ;
+A: NMN_TOLL ;

LEXICON A_ALGG !!= * @CODE@ põrtt:põrtt
!! friskk
:%^V2VV%^XYY2XY A-ATTR_âs ;
!+A+Der/MWN: N_ALGG ;
+A: NMN_ALGG ;

LEXICON A_AUTT !!= * @CODE@ autt:autt
!! võikk
:%^V2VV%^XYY2XY A-ATTR_âs ;
!+A+Der/MWN: N_AUTT ;
+A: NMN_AUTT ;

LEXICON A_MUORR !!= * @CODE@ muõrr:muõrr
:%^CC2C A-ATTR_âs ;
!+A+Der/MWN: N_MUORR ;
+A: NMN_MUORR ;

LEXICON A_KUÕCC !!= * @CODE@ kuõcc:kuõcc
+A+Attr:%^KK2GG%>âs # ;
+A+Comp+Attr:%^KK2GG%>»j»ab # ;
+A+Superl+Attr:%^KK2GG%>»j»ummus # ;
+A+Comp:%^KK2GG%>j»ab NMN_AANAR ;
+A+Superl:%^KK2GG%>j»ummus NMN_MAINSTUMMUSH ;
+A: NMN_LUÕSS ;

LEXICON A_ČUÕŠKK !!= * @CODE@ čuõškk:čuõškk
!! tuõlbb
:%^XYY2XY A-ATTR_âs ;
!+A+Der/MWN: N_ČUÕŠKK ;
+A: NMN_ČUÕŠKK ;

LEXICON A_MIÂRKK !!= * @CODE@ sǩiâŋkk:sǩiâŋkk
!! hiâlpp
:%^XYY2XY A-ATTR_âs ;
!+A+Der/MWN: N_MIÂRKK ;
+A: NMN_MIÂRKK ;

LEXICON A_PLAAN !!= * @CODE@ plaan:plaan
:%^V2VV A-ATTR_âs ; !!Check this 2015-09-17
!+A+Der/MWN:  N_PLAAN ;
+A: NMN_PLAAN ;


!! CLASS 1 LOW VOWEL, NO PALATALIZATION NOMINALS

LEXICON A_VÄÄŽŽ
! Gradation: None
! 1.115
!! ** Yaml: __A-vaeaezhzh__
+A+Attr: FINAL1 ;
+A+Sg+Nom: FINAL1 ;
+A+Pl+Nom: FINAL1 ;
: A-ATTR_as ;
!+A+Der/MWN: N_VÄÄŽŽ ;
+A: NMN_VÄÄŽŽ ;


!! CLASS 1 LOW VOWEL, PALATALIZATION, ILLATIVE IN U NOMINALS


!! CLASS 1 HIGH VOWEL, PALATALIZATION NOMINALS
LEXICON A_NUQBB  !!= * @CODE@ nuʹbb:nubb
! Gradation: None
! 1.115
!! ** Yaml: __A-nubb__
:%^V2VV%^PAL   A-ATTR_es ;
+A+Sg+Nom:%^PAL FINAL1 ;
+A+Pl+Nom:%^V2VV%^PAL FINAL1 ;
!+A+Der/MWN: N_NUQBB ;
+A: NMN_NUQBB ;

LEXICON A_KUEQLL !!= * @CODE@ kueʹll:kuâll
! vowel: diphthong
:%^PALE%^PAL%^CC2C   A-ATTR_es ;
!+A+Der/MWN: N_KUEQLL ;
+A: NMN_KUEQLL ;

LEXICON A_MUEQRJJ !!= * @CODE@ mueʹrjj:mueʹrjj
! vowel: diphthong
:%^PALE%^PAL%^XYY2XY   A-ATTR_es ;
!+A+Der/MWN: N_MUEQRJJ ;
+A: NMN_MUEQRJJ ;

!! CLASS 1 LOW VOWEL, PALATALIZATION NOMINALS

LEXICON A_VAQLL !!= * @CODE@ väʹll:väll
:%^V2VV%^PAL   A-ATTR_es ;
!+A+Der/MWN: N_VAQLL ;
+A: NMN_VAQLL ;

LEXICON A_UQCC !!= * @CODE@ uʹcc:u%^1VOWcc
:%^V2VV%^PAL   A-ATTR_es ;
+A: NMN_UQCC ;

LEXICON A_SAAQMM !!= * @CODE@ sääʹmm:säämm
:%^CC2C%^PAL   A-ATTR_es ;
!+A+Der/MWN: N_SAAQMM ;
+A: NMN_SAAQMM ;

LEXICON A_CHAAQCC !!= * @CODE@ čääʹcc:čääcc
:%^PAL%^KK2GG   A-ATTR_es ;
+A+Der/MWN: N_CHAAQCC ;
+A: NMN_CHAAQCC ;

LEXICON A_KAQLBB !!= * @CODE@ käʹlbb:kälbb âʹlǧǧ:âlgg
! vowel: monophthong
:%^V2VV%^PAL%^CC2C   A-ATTR_es ;
!+A+Der/MWN: N_KAQLBB ;
+A: NMN_KAQLBB ;

LEXICON A_HAAQSKH !!= * @CODE@ hääʹsǩ:hääsk
! vowel: monophthong
! gradation: no
:%^PAL   A-ATTR_es ;
+A: NMN_HAAQSKH ;


LEXICON A_SEQTT !!= * @CODE@ seʹtt:sẹtt
! vowel: monophthong
!! CHECKME
:%^V2VV%^PAL   A-ATTR_es ;
!+A+Der/MWN: N_SEQTT ;
+A: NMN_SEQTT ;


LEXICON A_KHEQRJJ !!= * @CODE@ ǩeʹrjj:ǩẹrjj
! vowel: monophthong
:%^V2VV%^PAL%^XYY2XY   A-ATTR_es ;
!+A+Der/MWN: N_KHEQRJJ ;
+A: NMN_KHEQRJJ ;

LEXICON A_JAUQRR !!= * @CODE@ jäuʹrr:jäurr
! vowel: monophthong
:%^V2VV%^PAL%^XYY2XY   A-ATTR_es ;
!+A+Der/MWN: N_JAUQRR ;
+A: NMN_JAUQRR ;

LEXICON A_PEIQVV !!= * @CODE@ peiʹvv:pẹivv
! vowel: monophthong
:%^V2VV%^PAL%^XYY2XY   A-ATTR_es ;
!+A+Der/MWN: N_PEIQVV ;
+A: NMN_PEIQVV ;

LEXICON A_SUEAQKHKH !!= * @CODE@ sueʹǩǩ:suäkk
!! cuẹʹǩǩ
:%^PALẸ%^PAL%^KK2GG   A-ATTR_es ;
+A+Sg+Nom:%^PALẸ%^PAL FINAL1 ;
+A+Pl+Nom:%^PALẸ%^PAL%^KK2GG FINAL1 ;
!+A+Der/MWN: N_SUEAQKHKH ;
+A: NMN_SUEAQKHKH ;

LEXICON A_KUEAQTT !!= * @CODE@ kuẹʹtt:kuätt
! vowel: diphthong
:%^PALẸ%^PAL%^CC2C   A-ATTR_es ;
!+A+Der/MWN: N_KUEAQTT ;
+A: NMN_KUEAQTT ;

LEXICON A_JEAQNNN !!= * @CODE@ jeäʹnn:jeänˈn, jeäʹǧǧ:jeägˈg
! vowel: diphthong
:%^PALẸ%^PAL%^CCC2CC   A-ATTR_es ;
!+A+Der/MWN: N_JEAQNNN ;
+A: NMN_JEAQNNN ;

LEXICON A_JEAQRMM !!= * @CODE@ jeäʹrmm:jeärmm
! vowel: diphthong
:%^PALẸ%^PAL%^XYY2XY   A-ATTR_es ;
!+A+Der/MWN: N_JEAQRMM ;
+A: NMN_JEAQRMM ;




!! CLASS denominals in -i
!! cf. Feist (2012: 198-199)
!! These will need their own expansions
!! HOW DOES JIÕʹNNI decline?
LEXICON A_JIOQNNI !!= * @CODE@ jiõʹnni:jiõnn FIXME 2016-04
+A+Attr:%^PAL%>es #   ;
+A+Sg+Nom:%^PAL%>i  # ;
+A:%^PAL%>j ADJ-DER/COMP_ab ;
+A:%^PAL%>j ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
LEXICON A_PÄRRAI !!= * @CODE@ pärrai:pärr
+A+Attr:%>as #   ;
+A+Sg+Nom:%>ai  # ;
+A:%>j ADJ-DER/COMP_ab ;
+A:%>j ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
LEXICON A_SAELTTAI !!= * @CODE@ sälttai:sältt
+A+Attr:%>as #   ;
+A+Sg+Nom:%>ai  # ;
+A:%>j ADJ-DER/COMP_ab ;
+A:%>j ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;


!! CLASS 

LEXICON A_SAJOS
!! -õs ending
+A: AdjAttr-Ø ;
+A: SG-NOM ;
+A:%{XC%}%^C2CC%>â ESS ;
+A:%{XC%}%^C2CC%>â PAR ;
+A: NMN_OBL-SAJOS ;

LEXICON A_KÅÅLVAK
+A+Attr:%^RmVow%>õs FINAL1 ;
+A:%^RmVow ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:%^RmVow ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
+A: NMN_KÅÅLVAK ;

LEXICON A_AACCIKH
+A+Attr:%^RmVow%^PALNo%>õs FINAL1 ;
+A:%^RmVow ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:%^RmVow ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
+A: NMN_AACCIKH ;

LEXICON A_KUALAZH
+A+Sg+Nom:až FINAL1 ;
+A+Pl+Nom:až FINAL1 ; !!= * @CODE@ Check this 2015-02-22
!+A+Der/MWN: N_KUALAZH ;
+A: NMN_KUALAZH ;

LEXICON A_VÕÕNÂS !!= * @CODE@ võõnâs:võnn
+A+Sg+Nom:%^V2VV%^CC2Câs FINAL1 ;
+A+Pl+Nom: FINAL1 ; !!= * @CODE@ Check this 2015-02-22
+A:s ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:s ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
!+A+Der/MWN: N_VÕÕNÂS ;
+A:âs NMN_VÕÕNÂS ;

LEXICON A_OOĐÂS !!= * @CODE@ oođâs:ođđ
+A+Attr: FINAL1 ;
+A:s ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:s ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
!+A+Der/MWN:âz NMN_VÕÕNÂS ;
+A:âs NMN_VÕÕNÂS ;

LEXICON A_KÕÕDDÂS !!= * @CODE@ kõõddâs:kõdd
+A+Attr: FINAL1 ;
+A+Sg+Nom:%^Pen%^V2VV%>âs FINAL1 ;
+A+Pl+Nom:%>âz FINAL1 ; !!= * @CODE@ Check this 2015-02-22
+A:s ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:s ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
!+A+Der/MWN:âz N_VÕÕNÂS ;
+A:âs NMN_KÕÕDDÂS ;

LEXICON A_MOOČČÂS !!= * @CODE@ mooččâs:močč
+A+Attr: FINAL1 ;
+A+Sg+Nom:%>âs FINAL1 ;
+A: ADJ-DER/COMP_ääb ;
+A: ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
+A:âs NMN_KÕÕDDÂS ;

LEXICON A_JÕÕSKÂS !!= * @CODE@ jõõskâs:jõskk
+A+Attr: FINAL1 ;
+A:s ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:s ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
!+A+Der/MWN:âs NMN_TAALKÂS ;
+A:âs NMN_TAALKÂS ;


LEXICON A_PIIUTÂS !!= * @CODE@ piiutâs:pihtt
+A+Attr: FINAL1 ;
+A:s ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:s ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
+A:âs NMN_PIIUTÂS ;

LEXICON A_FIINÂS !!= * @CODE@ fiinâs:fijnn
+A+Attr:%^XYY2VY FINAL1 ;	! fiin
+A:s ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:s ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
!+A+Der/MWN:âz NMN_FIINÂS ;	! fijnnâz
+A:âs NMN_FIINÂS ;	! fijnnâz


LEXICON A_IIRÂS !!= * @CODE@ iirâs:irr
+A+Attr:%^PAL%>es FINAL1 ;
+A:s ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:s ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
!+A+Der/MWN:âz N_VÕÕNÂS ;
+A:âs NMN_VÕÕNÂS ;

LEXICON A_ÕÕMÂS !!= * @CODE@ õõmâs:õmm
+A+Attr:sõs FINAL1 ;
+A:s ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:s ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
!+A+Der/MWN:âz N_VÕÕNÂS ;
+A:âs NMN_VÕÕNÂS ;

LEXICON A_RUÕDDÂS !!= * @CODE@ ruõddâs:ruõdˈd
+A+Attr: FINAL1 ;
+A:s ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:s ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
!+A+Der/MWN:âz N_RUÕDDÂS ;
+A:âs NMN_RUÕDDÂS ;

LEXICON A_TUÕVÂS !!= * @CODE@ tuõvâs:tuõvv
+A+Attr:sõs FINAL1 ;
+A:s ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:s ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
!+A+Der/MWN:âz N_TUÕVÂS ;
+A:âs NMN_TUÕVÂS ;


LEXICON A_VUÕIVÂS !!= * @CODE@ vuõivâs:vuõivv
+A+Attr: FINAL1 ;
+A:s ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:s ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
!+A+Der/MWN:âz N_VUÕIVÂS ;
+A:âs NMN_VUÕIVÂS ;


!LEXICON A_VIIRRÂM 
!! viirrâm:viirrâm
!+A+Attr:%^RmVow%>õs FINAL1 ;
!+A:%^RmVow ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
!+A:%^RmVow ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
!!+A+Der/MWN: N_VIIRRÂM ;
!+A: NMN_VIIRRÂM ;

LEXICON A_KÅÅVAS !!= * @CODE@ kååvas:kåvv
+A+Attr: FINAL1 ;
+A:s ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:s ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
+A:as NMN_KÅÅVAS ;

LEXICON A_KÅÅDDAS !!= * @CODE@ kååddas:kåådd
+A+Attr: FINAL1 ;
+A:s ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:s ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
+A:as NMN_KÅÅDDAS ;

LEXICON A_JÄLLAŠ !!= * @CODE@ jällaš:jällaš
+A+Attr:%^RmVow%>õs FINAL1 ;
+A:%^RmVow ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:%^RmVow ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
!+A+Der/MWN: NMN_MAINSTUMMUSH ;
+A: NMN_MAINSTUMMUSH ;

LEXICON A_TOBDDSALLAŠ != * @CODE@ tobddsallaš:
+A+Attr: FINAL1 ;
+A:%^RmVow ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:%^RmVow ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
!+A+Der/MWN: NMN_MAINSTUMMUSH ;
+A: NMN_MAINSTUMMUSH ;

LEXICON A_VAALMÂŠ !!= * @CODE@ vaalmâš:valmmâš
+A+Attr:%^RmVow%>õs FINAL1 ;
+A:%^RmVow ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:%^RmVow ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
+A: NMN_TAALKÂS ;


LEXICON A_VEEIDAS !!= * @CODE@ veeidas:veidd
+A+Attr:sõs FINAL1 ;
+A:s ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:s ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
+A:as NMN_PÄÄLKAS ;


LEXICON A_AANAR !!= * @CODE@ späʹsseb:späʹsseb
+A+Attr:%^RmVow%>õs FINAL1 ;
+A:%^RmVow ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:%^RmVow ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
+A: NMN_AANAR ;



LEXICON A_KAAQMES  !!= * @CODE@ kääʹmes:kämm
+A+Attr:%^V2VV%^PAL FINAL1 ;
+A:s ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:s ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
+A:es NMN_OAQVES ; !!= * @CODE@   kääʹmes:kämmez
+A+Der/vuõtt:%^PAL%^V2VV%>es»vuõtt N_MUORR ; 

LEXICON A_KAAQLLES  !!= * @CODE@ kääʹlles:kä%^1VOWll
+A+Attr:%^V2VV%^PAL FINAL1 ;
+A:s ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:s ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
+A:es NMN_KAAQLLES ; !!= * @CODE@   kääʹmes:kämmez
+A+Der/vuõtt:%^PAL%^V2VV%>es»vuõtt N_MUORR ; 

LEXICON A_KOAQSHKHES !!= * @CODE@ kååʹšǩes:kåškk
+A+Attr:%^PAL FINAL1 ;
+A:s ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:s ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
+A:es NMN_KAAQRBES ;
+A+Der/vuõtt:%^PAL%^XYY2XY%>es»vuõtt N_MUORR ; 

LEXICON A_KHEEQLES  !!= * @CODE@ ǩeeʹles:ǩeâlˈl
+A+Attr:%^Pen%PALE%^Pen%^PAL%^Pen%^CCC2C%>es FINAL1 ; !CHECKME
+A:s ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:s ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
+A:es NMN_KHEEQLES ; !!= * @CODE@	ǩeeʹles:ǩeâlˈles
+A+Der/vuõtt:%^PALE%^PAL%^CCC2C%>es»vuõtt N_MUORR ; 


LEXICON A_PUAQRES  !!= * @CODE@ puäʹres:puärˈr
+A+Attr:%^PAL FINAL1 ;
+A:s ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:s ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
+A:es NMN_PUAQRES ; !!= * @CODE@   puäʹres:puärˈres
+A+Der/vuõtt:%^PAL%^CCC2C%>es»vuõtt N_MUORR ; 

LEXICON A_CHUEQDHES  !!= * @CODE@ čueʹđes:čuâtˈt
+A+Attr:%^PAL FINAL1 ;
+A:s ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:s ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
+A:es NMN_CHUEQDHES ; !!= * @CODE@   puäʹres:puärˈrez
+A+Der/vuõtt:%^PALE%^PAL%^CCC2C%>es»vuõtt N_MUORR ; 

LEXICON A_CHUEAQCKHES  !!= * @CODE@ čueʹcǩes:čuäckkez
+A+Attr:%^PALẸ%^PAL FINAL1 ; !CHECKME
+A:s ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:s ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
+A:es NMN_CHUEAQCKHES ; !!= * @CODE@  čueʹcǩes:čuäckkez
+A+Der/vuõtt:%^PALẸ%^PAL%^XYY2XY%>es»vuõtt N_MUORR ; 


LEXICON A_PRSPRC-EEI !!= * @CODE@ tuejjeei:tuejjee
+A+Attr:jes FINAL1 ;
+A+Attr:jas FINAL1 ; !!= * @CODE@ c.f. sjm faʹlsǩeejas
+A: NMN_PRSPRC-EEI ;
+A:j ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:j ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;

!! WORK HERE 2015-10-14 deverbals
LEXICON A_PRSPRC-VCC-I !!= * @CODE@ cõggi:cõggi
+A: NMN_PRSPRC-VCC-I ;
+A:%^I2J ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:%^I2J ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;

LEXICON A_PRSPRC-VVCC-I !!= * @CODE@ jõõvvi:jõõvvi
!! ** Yaml: __A-vaeaezhzh__
+A: NMN_PRSPRC-VVCC-I ;
+A:%^I2J ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:%^I2J ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
LEXICON A_PRSPRC-VVKK-I !!= * @CODE@ lookki:lookki
+A: NMN_PRSPRC-VVKK-I ;
+A:%^I2J ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:%^I2J ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
LEXICON A_KOBDDI !!= * @CODE@ kobddi:kobddi SEE following A_TOBDDI diff
+A+Attr:%^RmVow # ;
+A: NMN_PRSPRC-VXYY-I ;
+A:%^I2J ADJ-DER/COMP_kõlmmsab ;
+A:%^I2J ADJ-DER/SUPERL_ummus ;
